Hawaii statutes.
[§321-346] Immunity from liability.
All agencies and individuals participating in the review of child deaths
pursuant to this part shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for
providing the information required under this part. [L 1997, c 369, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next